trunk/apertium-es-ro/apertium-es-ro.ro.dix
<pardef n="v/ărsa__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ărsa</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărs</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>erși</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>arsă</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsăm</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsați</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>arsă</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsăm</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsai</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsa</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsam</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsați</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsau</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsasem</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsaseși</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsase</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsasem</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsaseți</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsaseră</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărs</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>erși</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>erse</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsăm</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsați</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>erse</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsat</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ărsat</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducând"/>
      </e>  
       <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsată</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsați</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsate</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsându</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducându"/>
      </e>      
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ărsând</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducând"/>
      </e>      
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ărsând</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>arsă</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducându"/>
      </e>
      <e>
      	<p> 
	  <l>arsă</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducând"/>
      </e>
      <e>
      	<p> 
	  <l>arsă</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>arse</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsăm</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ărsați</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducându"/>
      </e>
      <e>
      	<p> 
	  <l>ărsați</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>arse</l>
	  <r>ărsa<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
    </pardef>

<e lm="vărsa">
        <i>v</i>
        <par n="v/ărsa__vblex"/>
      </e>
